mn_MN.aff
FLAG long
SFX G0 Y 615
SFX G0 0 аа/08 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 аа/08 [рг]
SFX G0 0 аагүйсэн [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 аагүйсэн [рг]
SFX G0 0 аад [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 аад [рг]
SFX G0 0 аадүй [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 аадүй [рг]
SFX G0 0 аарай [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 аарай [рг]
SFX G0 0 аасай [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 аасай [рг]
SFX G0 0 аач [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 аач [рг]
SFX G0 0 ав [рг]
SFX G0 0 ам [рг]
SFX G0 0 авч [рг]
SFX G0 0 аг [рг]
SFX G0 0 агтун [рг]
SFX G0 0 агч/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 агчид/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 агсад/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 агчдынх/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 агсдынх/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 агчийнх/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 алгүй [рг]
SFX G0 0 алтай [рг]
SFX G0 0 алгүйгээр [рг]
SFX G0 0 амгай [рг]
SFX G0 0 амгүй [рг]
SFX G0 0 амз [рг]
SFX G0 0 амтгай [рг]
SFX G0 0 амхай [рг]
SFX G0 0 ан [рг]
SFX G0 0 ангаа [рг]
SFX G0 0 ангуут/00 [рг]
SFX G0 0 ах/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахаар/08 [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахааргүйсэн [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахлаар/00 [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахсан [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахуй/70 [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахуйнх/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахуйц/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахуйцынх/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахул [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахчаа [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахчаан [рг]
SFX G0 0 ахынх/040870 [рг]
SFX G0 0 баас [лмв]
SFX G0 0 бал [лмв]
SFX G0 0 ваас [^лмв]
SFX G0 0 вал [^лмв]
SFX G0 0 гүй/0773 их
SFX G0 0 даа их
SFX G0 0 даг/040870 .
SFX G0 0 дагсан .
SFX G0 0 даггүйсэн .
SFX G0 0 дагийнх/040870 [жчшхдсцт]
SFX G0 0 дагчлан .
SFX G0 0 дгийнх/040870 [ргл]
SFX G0 0 ж л
SFX G0 0 жухуй .
SFX G0 0 жээ [^рг]
SFX G0 0 зана .
SFX G0 0 ив [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 им [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ивч [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 иг [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 игтун [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 игч/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 игчид/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 игсад/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 игчдынх/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 игсдынх/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 игчийнх/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 иж [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 илгүй [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 илтай [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 илгүйгээр [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 имгай [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 имгүй [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 имз [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 имтгай [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 имхай [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ин [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ина [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ингаа [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ингуут/00 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 их/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихаар/08 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихааргүйсэн [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихлаар/00 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихсан [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихуй/70 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихуйнх/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихуйц/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихуйцынх/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихул [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихчаа [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихчаан [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ихынх/040870 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ишгүй/73 [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 лаа .
SFX G0 0 маанжин .
SFX G0 0 маар/0408 их
SFX G0 0 маар/08 .
SFX G0 0 маарсан .
SFX G0 0 мааргүйсэн .
SFX G0 0 магц/00 .
SFX G0 0 муй .
SFX G0 0 на [а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 на [рглхдсцт]
SFX G0 0 нам .
SFX G0 0 руун .
SFX G0 0 саар .
SFX G0 0 сан/040870 .
SFX G0 0 санчлан .
SFX G0 0 саных/040870 [жчшхдсцт]
SFX G0 0 сных/040870 [ргл]
SFX G0 0 санууд/040870 [жчшхдсцт]
SFX G0 0 снууд/040870 [ргл]
SFX G0 0 су .
SFX G0 0 сугай .
SFX G0 0 тай/70 их
SFX G0 0 тайтай их
SFX G0 0 тал .
SFX G0 0 талаа [^схглр]
SFX G0 0 тлаа [схглр]
SFX G0 0 тугай .
SFX G0 0 уужин [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 уужин [рг]
SFX G0 0 уузай [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 уузай [рг]
SFX G0 0 ууштай [^а][жчш]
SFX G0 0 ууштай [рг]
SFX G0 0 ч [рг]
SFX G0 0 чухуй .
SFX G0 0 чээ [рг]
SFX G0 0 шгүй/73 [лрг]
SFX G0 0 ъя .
SFX G0 0 ъюу .
SFX G0 ад даа/08 ад
SFX G0 ад даагүйсэн ад
SFX G0 ад даад ад
SFX G0 ад даадүй ад
SFX G0 ад даарай ад
SFX G0 ад даасай ад
SFX G0 ад даач ад
SFX G0 ад дав ад
SFX G0 ад дам ад
SFX G0 ад давч ад
SFX G0 ад даг ад
SFX G0 ад дагтун ад
SFX G0 ад дагч/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дагчид/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дагсад/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дагчдынх/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дагсдынх/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дагчийнх/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дагчлан ад
SFX G0 ад даж ад
SFX G0 ад далгүй ад
SFX G0 ад далтай ад
SFX G0 ад далгүйгээр ад
SFX G0 ад дамгай ад
SFX G0 ад дамгүй ад
SFX G0 ад дамз ад
SFX G0 ад дамтгай ад
SFX G0 ад дамхай ад
SFX G0 ад дан ад
SFX G0 ад дангаа ад
SFX G0 ад дангуут/00 ад
SFX G0 ад дах/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дахаар/08 ад
SFX G0 ад дахааргүйсэн ад
SFX G0 ад дахлаар/00 ад
SFX G0 ад дахсан ад
SFX G0 ад дахуй/70 ад
SFX G0 ад дахуйн ад
SFX G0 ад дахуйнх/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дахуйц/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дахуйцынх/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дахул ад
SFX G0 ад дахчаа ад
SFX G0 ад дахчаан ад
SFX G0 ад дахынх/040870 ад
SFX G0 ад дашгүй/73 ад
SFX G0 ад дуужин ад
SFX G0 ад дуузай ад
SFX G0 ад дууштай ад
SFX G0 аж жаа/040870 аж
SFX G0 аж жаагүйсэн аж
SFX G0 аж жаад аж
SFX G0 аж жаадүй аж
SFX G0 аж жаарай аж
SFX G0 аж жаасай аж
SFX G0 аж жаач аж
SFX G0 аж жив аж
SFX G0 аж жим аж
SFX G0 аж живч аж
SFX G0 аж жиг аж
SFX G0 аж жигтун аж
SFX G0 аж жигч/040870 аж
SFX G0 аж жигчдынх/040870 аж
SFX G0 аж жигсдынх/040870 аж
SFX G0 аж жигчид/040870 аж
SFX G0 аж жигсад/040870 аж
SFX G0 аж жигчийнх/040870 аж
SFX G0 аж жиж аж
SFX G0 аж жилгүй аж
SFX G0 аж жилтай аж
SFX G0 аж жилгүйгээр аж
SFX G0 аж жимгай аж
SFX G0 аж жимгүй аж
SFX G0 аж жимз аж
SFX G0 аж жимтгай аж
SFX G0 аж жимхай аж
SFX G0 аж жин аж
SFX G0 аж жингаа аж
SFX G0 аж жингуут/00 аж
SFX G0 аж жих/040870 аж
SFX G0 аж жихаар/08 аж
SFX G0 аж жихааргүйсэн аж
SFX G0 аж жихлаар/00 аж
SFX G0 аж жихсан аж
SFX G0 аж жихуй/70 аж
SFX G0 аж жихуйц/040870 аж
SFX G0 аж жихуйцынх/060872 аж
SFX G0 аж жихул аж
SFX G0 аж жихчаа аж
SFX G0 аж жихчаан аж
SFX G0 аж жихынх/040870 аж
SFX G0 аж жишгүй/73 аж
SFX G0 аж жуужин аж
SFX G0 аж жуузай аж
SFX G0 аж жууштай аж
SFX G0 ал лаа/08 ал
SFX G0 ал лаагүйсэн ал
SFX G0 ал лаад ал
SFX G0 ал лаадүй ал
SFX G0 ал лаарай ал
SFX G0 ал лаасай ал
SFX G0 ал лаач ал
SFX G0 ал лав ал
SFX G0 ал лам ал
SFX G0 ал лавч ал
SFX G0 ал лаг ал
SFX G0 ал лагтун ал
SFX G0 ал лагч/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал лагчдынх/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал лагсдынх/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал лагчид/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал лагсад/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал лагчийнх/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал лалгүй ал
SFX G0 ал лалтай ал
SFX G0 ал лалгүйгээр ал
SFX G0 ал ламгай ал
SFX G0 ал ламгүй ал
SFX G0 ал ламз ал
SFX G0 ал ламтгай ал
SFX G0 ал ламхай ал
SFX G0 ал лан ал
SFX G0 ал лангаа ал
SFX G0 ал лангуут/00 ал
SFX G0 ал лах/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал лахаар/08 ал
SFX G0 ал лахааргүйсэн ал
SFX G0 ал лахлаар/00 ал
SFX G0 ал лахсан ал
SFX G0 ал лахуй/70 ал
SFX G0 ал лахуйн ал
SFX G0 ал лахуйнх/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал лахуйц/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал лахуйцынх/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал лахул ал
SFX G0 ал лахчаа ал
SFX G0 ал лахчаан ал
SFX G0 ал лахынх/040870 ал
SFX G0 ал луужин ал
SFX G0 ал луузай ал
SFX G0 ал лууштай ал
SFX G0 ас саа/08 ас
SFX G0 ас саагүйсэн ас
SFX G0 ас саад ас
SFX G0 ас саадүй ас
SFX G0 ас саарай ас
SFX G0 ас саасай ас
SFX G0 ас саач ас
SFX G0 ас сав ас
SFX G0 ас сам ас
SFX G0 ас савч ас
SFX G0 ас саг ас
SFX G0 ас сагтун ас
SFX G0 ас сагч/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас сагчид/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас сагсад/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас сагчдынх/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас сагсдынх/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас сагчийнх/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас саж ас
SFX G0 ас салгүй ас
SFX G0 ас салтай ас
SFX G0 ас салгүйгээр ас
SFX G0 ас самгай ас
SFX G0 ас самгүй ас
SFX G0 ас самз ас
SFX G0 ас самтгай ас
SFX G0 ас самхай ас
SFX G0 ас сан ас
SFX G0 ас сангаа ас
SFX G0 ас сангуут/00 ас
SFX G0 ас сах/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас сахаар/08 ас
SFX G0 ас сахааргүйсэн ас
SFX G0 ас сахлаар/00 ас
SFX G0 ас сахсан ас
SFX G0 ас сахуй/70 ас
SFX G0 ас сахуйн ас
SFX G0 ас сахуйнх/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас сахуйц/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас сахуйцынх/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас сахул ас
SFX G0 ас сахчаа ас
SFX G0 ас сахчаан ас
SFX G0 ас сахынх/040870 ас
SFX G0 ас сашгүй/73 ас
SFX G0 ас суужин ас
SFX G0 ас суузай ас
SFX G0 ас сууштай ас
SFX G0 ац цаа/08 ац
SFX G0 ац цаагүйсэн ац
SFX G0 ац цаад ац
SFX G0 ац цаадүй ац
SFX G0 ац цаарай ац
SFX G0 ац цаасай ац
SFX G0 ац цаач ац
SFX G0 ац цав ац
SFX G0 ац цам ац
SFX G0 ац цавч ац
SFX G0 ац цаг ац
SFX G0 ац цагтун ац
SFX G0 ац цагч/040870 ац
SFX G0 ац цагчид/040870 ац
SFX G0 ац цагсад/040870 ац
SFX G0 ац цагчдынх/040870 ац
SFX G0 ац цагсдынх/040870 ац
SFX G0 ац цагчийнх/040870 ац
SFX G0 ац цаж ац
SFX G0 ац цалгүй ац
SFX G0 ац цалтай ац
SFX G0 ац цалгүйгээр ац
SFX G0 ац цамгай ац
SFX G0 ац цамгүй ац
SFX G0 ац цамз ац
SFX G0 ац цамтгай ац
SFX G0 ац цамхай ац
SFX G0 ац цан ац
SFX G0 ац цангаа ац
SFX G0 ац цангуут/00 ац
SFX G0 ац цах/040870 ац
SFX G0 ац цахаар/08 ац
SFX G0 ац цахааргүйсэн ац
SFX G0 ац цахлаар/00 ац
SFX G0 ац цахсан ац
SFX G0 ац цахуй/70 ац
SFX G0 ац цахуйн ац
SFX G0 ац цахуйнх ац
SFX G0 ац цахуйнхаа ац
SFX G0 ац цахуйц/040870 ац
SFX G0 ац цахуйцынх/040870 ац
SFX G0 ац цахул ац
SFX G0 ац цахчаа ац
SFX G0 ац цахчаан ац
SFX G0 ац цахынх/040870 ац
SFX G0 ац цашгүй/73 ац
SFX G0 ац цуужин ац
SFX G0 ац цуузай ац
SFX G0 ац цууштай ац
SFX G0 ач чаа/08 ач
SFX G0 ач чаагүйнх/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чаагүйсэн ач
SFX G0 ач чаад ач
SFX G0 ач чаадүй ач
SFX G0 ач чаарай ач
SFX G0 ач чаасай ач
SFX G0 ач чаач ач
SFX G0 ач чив ач
SFX G0 ач чим ач
SFX G0 ач чивч ач
SFX G0 ач чиг ач
SFX G0 ач чигтун ач
SFX G0 ач чигч/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чигчид/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чигсад/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чигчдынх/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чигсдынх/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чигчийнх/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чиж ач
SFX G0 ач чилгүй ач
SFX G0 ач чилтай ач
SFX G0 ач чилгүйгээр ач
SFX G0 ач чимгай ач
SFX G0 ач чимгүй ач
SFX G0 ач чимз ач
SFX G0 ач чимтгай ач
SFX G0 ач чимхай ач
SFX G0 ач чин ач
SFX G0 ач чингаа ач
SFX G0 ач чингуут/00 ач
SFX G0 ач чих/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чихаар/08 ач
SFX G0 ач чихааргүйсэн ач
SFX G0 ач чихлаар/00 ач
SFX G0 ач чихсан ач
SFX G0 ач чихуй/70 ач
SFX G0 ач чихуйц/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чихуйцынх/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чихул ач
SFX G0 ач чихчаа ач
SFX G0 ач чихчаан ач
SFX G0 ач чихынх/040870 ач
SFX G0 ач чишгүй/73 ач
SFX G0 ач чуужин ач
SFX G0 ач чуузай ач
SFX G0 ач чууштай ач
SFX G0 аш шаа/08 аш
SFX G0 аш шаагүйсэн аш
SFX G0 аш шаад аш
SFX G0 аш шаадүй аш
SFX G0 аш шаарай аш
SFX G0 аш шаасай аш
SFX G0 аш шаач аш
SFX G0 аш шив аш
SFX G0 аш шим аш
SFX G0 аш шивч аш
SFX G0 аш шиг аш
SFX G0 аш шигтун аш
SFX G0 аш шигч/040870 аш
SFX G0 аш шигчид/040870 аш
SFX G0 аш шигсад/040870 аш
SFX G0 аш шигчдынх/040870 аш
SFX G0 аш шигсдынх/040870 аш
SFX G0 аш шигчийнх/040870 аш
SFX G0 аш шиж аш
SFX G0 аш шилгүй аш
SFX G0 аш шилтай аш
SFX G0 аш шилгүйгээр аш
SFX G0 аш шимгай аш
SFX G0 аш шимгүй аш
SFX G0 аш шимз аш
SFX G0 аш шимтгай аш
SFX G0 аш шимхай аш
SFX G0 аш шин аш
SFX G0 аш шингаа аш
SFX G0 аш шингуут/00 аш
SFX G0 аш ших/040870 аш
SFX G0 аш шихаар/08 аш
SFX G0 аш шихааргүйсэн аш
SFX G0 аш шихлаар/00 аш
SFX G0 аш шихсан аш
SFX G0 аш шихуй/70 аш
SFX G0 аш шихуйц/040870 аш
SFX G0 аш шихуйцынх/040870 аш
SFX G0 аш шихул аш
SFX G0 аш шихчаа аш
SFX G0 аш шихчаан аш
SFX G0 аш шихынх/040870 аш
SFX G0 аш шишгүй/73 аш
SFX G0 аш шуужин аш
SFX G0 аш шуузай аш
SFX G0 аш шууштай аш
SFX G0 ид даа/08 ид
SFX G0 ид даагүйсэн ид
SFX G0 ид даад ид
SFX G0 ид даадүй ид
SFX G0 ид даарай ид
SFX G0 ид даасай ид
SFX G0 ид даач ид
SFX G0 ид дав ид
SFX G0 ид дам ид
SFX G0 ид давч ид
SFX G0 ид даг ид
SFX G0 ид дагтун ид
SFX G0 ид дагч/040870 ид
SFX G0 ид дагчид/040870 ид
SFX G0 ид дагсад/040870 ид
SFX G0 ид дагчийнх/040870 ид
SFX G0 ид дагчдынх/040870 ид
SFX G0 ид дагсдынх/040870 ид
SFX G0 ид дагчлан ид
SFX G0 ид даж ид
SFX G0 ид далгүй ид
SFX G0 ид далтай ид
SFX G0 ид далгүйгээр ид
SFX G0 ид дамгай ид
SFX G0 ид дамгүй ид
SFX G0 ид дамз ид
SFX G0 ид дамтгай ид
SFX G0 ид дамхай ид
SFX G0 ид дан ид
SFX G0 ид дангаа ид
SFX G0 ид дангуут/00 ид
SFX G0 ид дах/040870 ид
SFX G0 ад дахаар/08 ид
SFX G0 ад дахааргүйсэн ид
SFX G0 ид дахлаар/00 ид
SFX G0 ид дахсан ид
SFX G0 ид дахуй/70 ид
SFX G0 ид дахуйн ид
SFX G0 ид дахуйнх/040870 ид
SFX G0 ид дахуйц/040870 ид
SFX G0 ид дахуйцынх/040870 ид
SFX G0 ид дахул ид
SFX G0 ид дахчаа ид
SFX G0 ид дахчаан ид
SFX G0 ид дахынх/040870 ид
SFX G0 ид дашгүй/73 ид
SFX G0 ид дуужин ид
SFX G0 ид дуузай ид
SFX G0 ид дууштай ид
SFX G0 ил лаа/08 ил
SFX G0 ил лаагүйсэн ил
SFX G0 ил лаад ил
SFX G0 ил лаадүй ил
SFX G0 ил лаарай ил
SFX G0 ил лаасай ил
SFX G0 ил лаач ил
SFX G0 ил лав ил
SFX G0 ил лам ил
SFX G0 ил лавч ил
SFX G0 ил лаг ил
SFX G0 ил лагтун ил
SFX G0 ил лагч/040870 ил
SFX G0 ил лагчид/040870 ил
SFX G0 ил лагсад/040870 ил
SFX G0 ил лагчдынх/040870 ил
SFX G0 ил лагсдынх/040870 ил
SFX G0 ил лагчийнх/040870 ил
SFX G0 ил лалгүй ил
